Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6242.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-47-9 and 11-47-35.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47
entitled "Weapons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-9. Persons exempt from restrictions.
(a) The provisions of § 11-47-8 shall not apply to sheriffs; deputy sheriffs; the
superintendent and members of the state police; members of the Rhode Island airport police
department; members of the Rhode Island state marshals capitol police; Rhode Island state fire
marshal; chief deputy state fire marshals; deputy state fire marshals assigned to the bomb squad,
and those assigned to the investigation unit; Providence fire department arson investigators,
provided that the investigator receiving the permit is a graduate of a police-training academy;
correctional officers, chief inspector and inspectors within the office of inspections, within the
department of corrections; members of the city or town police force; capitol police investigators of
the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to § 42-9-8.1; the witness protection
coordinator for the witness protection review board as set forth in chapter 30 of title 12 and subject
to the minimum qualifications of § 42-9-8.1; automobile theft investigators of the Rhode Island
state police pursuant to § 31-50-1; railroad police while traveling to and from official assignments
or while on assignments; conservation officers; or other duly appointed law enforcement officers;
nor to members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, and Marine Corps of the United States, the National
Guard, or organized reserves, when on duty; nor to members of organizations by law authorized to
purchase or receive firearms from the United States or this state, provided these members are at, or

going to or from, their places of assembly or target practice; nor to officers or employees of the
United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm; nor to any civilian guard or criminal
investigator carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties
under the authority of the commanding officer of the military establishment in the state of Rhode
Island where he or she is employed by the United States; nor to any civilian guard carrying sidearms
or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the
adjutant general where he or she is employed guarding a national guard facility, provided, that the
commanding officer of the military establishment shall have on file with the attorney general of
this state a list of the names and addresses of all civilian guards and criminal investigators so
authorized; nor to duly authorized military organizations when on duty; nor to members when at,
or going to or from, their customary places of assembly; nor to any individual employed in the
capacity of warden, associate warden, major, captain, lieutenant, sergeant, correctional officer or
investigator at any project owned or operated by a municipal detention facility corporation,
including the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility; nor to the regular and/or ordinary transportation
of pistols or revolvers as merchandise; nor to any person while transporting a pistol, or revolvers,
unloaded from the place of purchase to their residence, or place of business, from their residence
to their place of business or from their place of business to their residence, or to a federal firearms
licensee for the purpose of sale, to or from a bona fide gunsmith, or firearms repair facility, to any
police station or other location designated as a site of a bona fide “gun buy-back” program, but
only if said pistol or revolver is unloaded and any ammunition for said pistol or revolver is not
readily or directly accessible from the passenger compartment of such vehicle while transporting
same and further provided, that in the case of a vehicle without a compartment separate from the
passenger compartment, the firearm or the ammunition shall be stored in a locked container.
(b) Persons exempted by the provisions of this section from the provisions of § 11-47-8
shall have the right to carry concealed firearms everywhere within this state; provided, that this
shall not be construed as giving the right to carry concealed firearms to a person transporting
firearms as merchandise or as household or business goods.
11-47-35.1. Persons exempt from § 11-47-35.
The provisions of § 11-47-35 shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-
time members of the state marshal’s office capitol police, full-time members of city or town police
departments, or state marshals capitol police or correctional officers or persons licensed under §
11-47-11.
LC002732 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002732
========
LC002732 - Page 3 of 4